src/fst/test/dict-gt-yamls/N-1Y-paarr_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:


  Noun - paarr: # Noun 1Â-stem 'couple/pair' - full paradigm
# 
     paarr+N+Sg+Nom: paarr
     paarr+N+Sg+Gen: paar
     paarr+N+Sg+Acc: paar
     paarr+N+Sg+Ill: paʹrre
     paarr+N+Sg+Loc: paarest
     paarr+N+Sg+Com: paarin
     paarr+N+Ess: paarren
     paarr+N+Par: paarred
     paarr+N+Sg+Abe: [paartaa, paartää]
     paarr+N+Pl+Nom: paar
     paarr+N+Pl+Gen: paari
     paarr+N+Pl+Acc: paarid
     paarr+N+Pl+Ill: paarid
     paarr+N+Pl+Loc: paarin
     paarr+N+Pl+Com: paarivuiʹm
     paarr+N+Pl+Abe: [paaritaa, paaritää]

##
     paarr+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: paarram
     paarr+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: paarrad
     paarr+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: paarres
     paarr+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: paarrem
     paarr+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: paarred
     paarr+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: paarrez
     paarr+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: paarran
     paarr+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: paarad
     paarr+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: paares
     paarr+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: paarren
     paarr+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: paared
     paarr+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: paarez
     paarr+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: paarran
     paarr+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: paarad
     paarr+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: paares
     paarr+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: paarren
     paarr+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: paared
     paarr+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: paarez
     paarr+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: parrsan
     paarr+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg2: parrsad
     paarr+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg3: parrses
     paarr+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: parrseen
     paarr+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl2: parrseed
     paarr+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl3: parrseez
     paarr+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: parstan
     paarr+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: parstad
     paarr+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: parstes
     paarr+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: parsteen
     paarr+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: parsteed
     paarr+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: parsteez
     paarr+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: paarinan
     paarr+N+Sg+Com+PxSg2: paarinad
     paarr+N+Sg+Com+PxSg3: paarines
     paarr+N+Sg+Com+PxPl1: paarineen
     paarr+N+Sg+Com+PxPl2: paarineed
     paarr+N+Sg+Com+PxPl3: paarineez
     paarr+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg1: paarrantää
     paarr+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg2: paaradtää
     paarr+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg3: paarestää
     paarr+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl1: paarrentää
     paarr+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl2: paaredtää
     paarr+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl3: paareztää
     paarr+N+Ess+PxSg1: parrnan
     paarr+N+Ess+PxSg2: parrnad
     paarr+N+Ess+PxSg3: parrnes
     paarr+N+Ess+PxPl1: parrneen
     paarr+N+Ess+PxPl2: parrneed
     paarr+N+Ess+PxPl3: parrneez
#
     paarr+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: paarran
     paarr+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: paarad
     paarr+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: paares
     paarr+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: paarren
     paarr+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: paared
     paarr+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: paarez
     paarr+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: paarään
     paarr+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: paarääd
     paarr+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: paarees
     paarr+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: paareen
     paarr+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: paareed
     paarr+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: paareez
     paarr+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: paarään
     paarr+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: paarääd
     paarr+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: paarees
     paarr+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: paareen
     paarr+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: paareed
     paarr+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: paareez
     paarr+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg1: paarään
     paarr+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: paarääd
     paarr+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg3: paarees
     paarr+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl1: paareen
     paarr+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: paareed
     paarr+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl3: paareez
     paarr+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: paarinan
     paarr+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: paarinad
     paarr+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: paarines
     paarr+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: paarineen
     paarr+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: paarineed
     paarr+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: paarineez
     paarr+N+Pl+Com+PxSg1: paaräänvuiʹm
     paarr+N+Pl+Com+PxSg2: paaräädvuiʹm
     paarr+N+Pl+Com+PxSg3: paareesvuiʹm
     paarr+N+Pl+Com+PxPl1: paareenvuiʹm
     paarr+N+Pl+Com+PxPl2: paareedvuiʹm
     paarr+N+Pl+Com+PxPl3: paareezvuiʹm
     paarr+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg1: paarääntää
     paarr+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg2: paaräädtää
     paarr+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg3: paareestää
     paarr+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl1: paareentää
     paarr+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl2: paareedtää
     paarr+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl3: paareeztää
#
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: paarâž
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen: paaʹre
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc: paaʹre
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill: paarže
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc: paaʹrest
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com: paaʹrein
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe: [paaʹretaa, paaʹretää]
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Ess: paaržen
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Par: paaržed
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom: paaʹre
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen: paaʹrei
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc: paaʹreid
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill: paaʹreid
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc: paaʹrein
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com: paaʹreivuiʹm
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe: [paaʹreitaa, paaʹreitää]
# according to Pekka 1991: 163--164
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: paaržam
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: paaržad
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: paaržes
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: paaržeem
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: paaržeed
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: paaržeez
     
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: paaržan
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: paaržad
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: paaržes
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: paaržeen
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: paaržeed
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: paaržeez
     
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: paaržan
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: paaržad
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: paaržes
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: paaržeen
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: paaržeed
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: paaržeez

     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: paaržasan
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg2: paaržasad
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg3: paaržasas
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: paaržeʹsen
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl2: paaržeʹsed
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl3: paaržeʹsez
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: paʹrstan
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: paʹrstad
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: paʹrstes
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: paʹrsteen
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: paʹrsteed
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: paʹrsteez
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: paaʹrinan
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxSg2: paaʹrinad
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxSg3: paaʹrines
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxPl1: paaʹrineen
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxPl2: paaʹrineed
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxPl3: paaʹrineez
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg1: paaržantää
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg2: paaržadtää
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg3: paaržestää
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl1: paaržeentää
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl2: paaržeedtää
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl3: paaržeeztää

#     
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: paaržan
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: paaržad
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: paaržes
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: paaržeen
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: paaržeed
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: paaržeez
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: paaʹrään
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: paaʹrääd
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: paaʹrees
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: paaʹreen
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: paaʹreed
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: paaʹreez
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: paaʹrään
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: paaʹrääd
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: paaʹrees
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: paaʹreen
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: paaʹreed
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: paaʹreez
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg1: paaʹrään
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: paaʹrääd
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg3: paaʹrees
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl1: paaʹreen
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: paaʹreed
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl3: paaʹreez
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: paaʹrinan
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: paaʹrinad
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: paaʹrines
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: paaʹrineen
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: paaʹrineed
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: paaʹrineez
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxSg1: paaʹräänvuiʹm
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxSg2: paaʹräädvuiʹm
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxSg3: paaʹreesvuiʹm
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxPl1: paaʹreenvuiʹm
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxPl2: paaʹreedvuiʹm
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxPl3: paaʹreezvuiʹm
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg1: paaʹrääntää
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg2: paaʹräädtää
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg3: paaʹreestää
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl1: paaʹreentää
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl2: paaʹreedtää
     paarr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl3: paaʹreeztää
